Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201986-1207
Application, defined.

Application means a written request submitted by an applicant to an authority (1) for a permit to collocate small wireless facilities on an existing utility pole or wireless support structure or (2) for a permit for approval for the installation, modification, or replacement of a utility pole to support the installation of a small wireless facility.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 7.
September 1, 2019